Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-896
Teachers; applicants; inquiries concerning religious affiliation prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to prepare or deliver any questionnaire, employment application, or information blank to any applicant for any teaching position in the public schools of this state if the questionnaire, employment application, or information blank contains any inquiry or reference to the religious affiliation or the religious belief of the applicant.

Laws 1937, c. 180, § 1, p. 710;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-1426;

R.S.1943, § 79-1406;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 368, p. 814;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1268;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 521.

For constitutional provisions for religious freedom, see Article I, section 4, and Article VII, section 11, Constitution of Nebraska.